Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [629.321] DETENTION AND TRANSPORT OF SUSPECTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), and also includes any officer or agent of a federal law enforcement agency or any law enforcement agency of another state or any person acting on behalf of a federal law enforcement agency or law enforcement agency of another state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin If a peace officer needs to detain or transport a person in a vehicle, the vehicle must: new text end new text begin (1) be specifically designed to transport humans safely; new text end new text begin (2) be owned or leased by a law enforcement agency; and new text end new text begin (3) contain conspicuous markings that identify the law enforcement agency that owns or leases the vehicle. new text end new text begin At a minimum, a vehicle must be equipped with a seat and seat belt for each person being detained or transported to satisfy clause (1). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivision 2 does not apply when exigent circumstances present an imminent danger to the life or physical safety of a peace officer, a person being detained or transported, or bystanders. new text end new text begin (b) Subdivision 2, clause (3), does not apply to investigations that require a peace officer to be undercover to protect the safety of the officer or others. new text end